Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 5151YH (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 2001 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 455L.1 Purpose. 1 Water is Iowaâs most valuable natural resource. It is 2 the intent of the general assembly to protect Iowaâs water 3 by requiring data centers to adopt cooling technologies that 4 significantly reduce water consumption and by promoting the 5 use of nonpotable, recycled, and treated wastewater in cooling 6 systems. The general assembly encourages innovation in 7 water reuse and treatment to reduce strain on municipal water 8 supplies and safeguard Iowaâs rivers and streams. 9 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 455L.2 Definitions. 10 For purposes of this section: 11 1. âCooling technologyâ means any system or process used to 12 regulate the temperature and humidity of data center equipment. 13 2. âData centerâ means a facility used to house computer 14 systems and associated components that consume at least one 15 megawatt of electricity annually. 16 3. âDepartmentâ means the department of natural resources. 17 4. âExpansion or renovationâ means any material upgrade to 18 an existing data centerâs infrastructure that increases its 19 cooling capacity or floor space. 20 5. âNew data centerâ means any facility applying for a 21 building permit for a data center on or after January 1, 2026. 22 6. âNonpotable waterâ means water not suitable for human 23 consumption without treatment, including surface water, river 24 water, graywater, or treated wastewater. 25 7. âTreated wastewaterâ means effluent that has undergone 26 chemical, physical, or biological treatment and meets all 27 regulatory standards for noncontact industrial reuse. 28 8. âWater-efficient cooling technologyâ means any cooling 29 technology that achieves a water usage effectiveness rating of 30 two-tenths or lower. 31 9. âWater usage effectiveness ratingâ means a metric that 32 measures how efficiently water is used for cooling. The rating 33 is calculated by dividing annual water usage in liters by the 34 energy consumption of information technology equipment in 35 -1- LSB 5151YH (3) 91 sb/js 1/ 5 H.F. 2001 kilowatt hours. 1 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 455L.3 Cooling and water sourcing 2 requirements. 3 1. All new data centers, and any data center permitted but 4 not yet under construction as of January 1, 2026, must utilize 5 water-efficient cooling technology. 6 2. Any expansion or renovation of an existing data center 7 on or after January 1, 2026, must bring the entire facility 8 into compliance with a water usage effectiveness rating of 9 two-tenths liter per kilowatt hour. 10 3. To reduce potable water demand and protect the stateâs 11 freshwater resources, data centers are encouraged to do the 12 following: 13 a. Utilize air-based or hybrid cooling systems. 14 b. Source water for cooling from nonpotable supplies, 15 including the following: 16 (1) Surface or river water. 17 (2) Storm water, graywater, or other recycled sources. 18 (3) Treated wastewater, especially where it would otherwise 19 be discharged directly to rivers or streams. 20 c. Install on-site or off-site water treatment systems that 21 bring such water described in paragraph âbâ to the appropriate 22 quality for cooling system use. 23 4. Data centers utilizing treated wastewater shall 24 coordinate with local utilities to ensure that water is used 25 prior to discharge, and that all thermal and chemical discharge 26 complies with applicable environmental standards. 27 5. Facilities subject to this section must submit a cooling 28 and water sourcing plan to the department prior to construction 29 or expansion or renovation, and also annual compliance 30 reports for five years following commissioning or expansion or 31 renovation. 32 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 455L.4 Enforcement and penalties. 33 1. The department shall adopt rules establishing procedures 34 for monitoring, enforcement, and verification under this 35 -2- LSB 5151YH (3) 91 sb/js 2/ 5 H.F. 2001 chapter. 1 2. The department may conduct inspections and audits, order 2 the submission of water usage and sourcing documentation, and 3 review treatment and cooling system operations. 4 3. A data center found in violation of a rule or order 5 issued pursuant to this section or in violation of section 6 455L.3 is subject to the following: 7 a. A civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars per day of 8 noncompliance. 9 b. A corrective action order with a compliance timeline. 10 c. Suspension or revocation of construction or operating 11 permits, if applicable. 12 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 455L.5 Exemptions. 13 1. Temporary exemptions of no greater than twelve months 14 may be granted by the department to new data centers or 15 data centers undergoing an expansion or renovation that 16 are required to meet the requirements of section 455L.3 for 17 demonstrated lack of feasible technology or water source access 18 or conditions that pose a risk to public health or safety. 19 2. Exemption requests must be supported by technical 20 documentation and include a proposed path to compliance. 21 Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 22 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 23 Sec. 7. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 24 retroactively to January 1, 2026, for all new data center 25 projects permitted on or after that date, any previously 26 permitted project that has not broken ground by that date, and 27 any data center expansion or renovation undertaken on or after 28 that date. 29